Georgia, session 2025_26, HB72.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
PART I
The sums of money hereinafter provided are appropriated for the State Fiscal Year beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, as prescribed hereinafter for such fiscal year.
PART II
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
H. B. 72
- 1 -

LC 33 9761
PART III
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 72
- 2 -